Hawaii statutes.
[§436M-3] Records and reports. Each
alarm business that maintains, services, or monitors alarm systems shall keep
accurate and up-to-date business records as may be required for at least two
years. The records shall include a log of all alarm activations, the date and
time of each activation, the reason (insofar as reason can be determined) for
each activation, and monthly counts of the number of activations at each alarm
user site that are reported to the police. [L 1986, c 134, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next